New York, session 2025-2026, A11450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Upon a determination by the metropolitan transportation 2 authority or the New York city transit authority that sufficient funds 3 have been committed to it specifically for such purpose, the metropol- 4 itan transportation authority, the public benefit corporation created by 5 subdivision 5 of section 1263 of the public authorities law, and the New 6 York city transit authority, the public benefit corporation created by 7 section 1201 of the public authorities law, shall use such specifically 8 committed funds to rename the 157th street subway station on the 1 line 9 on 157th street of the New York city subway to 157th street subway - 10 Hispanic Society station. The metropolitan transportation authority 11 shall ensure that all signs and any other items issued by the metropol- 12 itan transportation authority are updated to accurately reflect the new 13 name of the station. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15939-01-6